New York, session 2025-2026, S4810.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 2 391-ccc to read as follows: 3 § 391-ccc. Retail premises of lithium-ion batteries, bicycles with 4 electric assist, micromobility devices, and limited use motorcycles. 1. 5 As used in this section, the following terms shall have the following 6 meanings: 7 (a) "battery case" means a metal container or cabinet specifically 8 designed and intended for the safe storage of lithium-ion batteries or 9 flammable materials; 10 (b) "lithium-ion battery" means a rechargeable battery with an organic 11 solvent electrolyte and positive and negative electrodes which utilize 12 an intercalation compound in which lithium is stored; and 13 (c) "micromobility device" means an electric scooter as defined in 14 section one hundred fourteen-e of the vehicle and traffic law, an elec- 15 tric personal assistive mobility device as defined in section one 16 hundred fourteen-d of the vehicle and traffic law, or other personal 17 mobility device powered by a lithium-ion battery. The term micromobility 18 device shall not include bicycles with electric assist as defined in 19 section one hundred two-c of the vehicle and traffic law, limited use 20 motorcycles as defined in section one hundred twenty-one-b of the vehi- 21 cle and traffic law, wheelchairs or other electrically driven mobility 22 assistance devices as defined in section one hundred thirty-a of the 23 vehicle and traffic law, or any vehicle that is capable of being regis- 24 tered with the department of motor vehicles. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09596-01-5 S. 4810 2 1 2. Any individual, firm, partnership, association, or corporation, 2 which operates a premises where bicycles with electric assist as defined 3 in section one hundred two-c of the vehicle and traffic law, micromobil- 4 ity devices, limited use motorcycles as defined in section one hundred 5 twenty-one-b of the vehicle and traffic law, or lithium-ion batteries 6 are sold at retail, repaired, or housed in a storage facility shall 7 maintain on such premises functional fire protection and suppression 8 measures effective against lithium-ion battery and electrical fires, 9 including but not limited to Class B extinguishers, battery cases, and 10 automatic monitoring and detection. In the event of an electrical fire, 11 such fire protection and suppression system shall have the capability of 12 an immediate response to mitigate and contain the fire. Nothing in this 13 section shall be construed to restrict a municipality from enforcing the 14 provisions of this subdivision or further require additional fire 15 protection and suppression measures. 16 3. Except for lithium-ion batteries that are completely enclosed 17 within the frame of a bicycle with electric assist and are not removable 18 without disassembly or that are in original protective shipping contain- 19 ers that comply with UN3481 or UN3171 and are so marked, any lithium-ion 20 batteries on the premises shall be required to be stored in battery 21 cases outside of the hours of operation of such retailer and/or while in 22 an unmanned facility during storage. 23 4. The department of state shall promulgate rules, regulations and 24 standards deemed necessary to implement the provisions of this section 25 on or before its effective date and, in conjunction with appropriate 26 agencies, shall establish standards for battery cases and the installa- 27 tion, operation and inspection of fire protection systems installed 28 pursuant to the provisions of this section. 29 5. A knowing violation of this section shall be punishable by a fine 30 not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars. 31 § 2. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 32 law.